Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 11 State Government Fraud Reduction

Editor's notes. —

These sections were enacted as §§

9-10-101

through

9-10-104

. As Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1, also enacted §§

9-10-101

through

9-10-104

, the sections enacted by Laws 1996, ch. 123, § 1 were redesignated as §§

9-11-101

through

9-11-104

.

§ 9-11-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “State Government Fraud Reduction Act.”

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 123, § 1.

§ 9-11-102.
Definitions; applicability.

As used in this chapter:

“Employee” means any person who works an average of twenty (20) hours or more per week during any six (6) month period and who is employed by the state performing a service for wages or other remuneration, excluding an independent contractor;

“Political subdivision” means a county, municipal or special district governing body or any combination thereof, school district or municipal corporation or a board, department, commission, council, agency or any member or employee thereof;

“State” means the state of Wyoming and any authority, board, commission, department, division or separate operating agency of the executive, legislative or judicial branch of the state of Wyoming, excluding its political subdivisions.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 123, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-11-103.
Discrimination against certain employees prohibited; civil action against employer.

No state employer may discharge, discipline or retaliate against an employee by unreasonably altering the terms, location or conditions of employment because the employee acting in good faith and within the scope of duties of employment:

Reports in writing to the employer what the employee has reasonable cause to believe is a demonstration of fraud, waste or gross mismanagement in state government office;

Reports in writing to the employer what the employee has reasonable cause to believe is a violation of a law, regulation, code or rule adopted under the laws of this state or the United States;

Reports in writing to the employer what the employee has reasonable cause to believe is a condition or practice that would put at risk the health or safety of that employee or any other individual;

Participates or is requested to participate in any investigation, hearing or inquiry; or

Has refused to carry out a directive which is beyond the scope, terms and conditions of his employment that would expose the employee or any individual to a condition likely to result in serious injury or death, after having sought and been unable to obtain a correction of the dangerous condition from the employer.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to an employee who has reported or caused to be reported a violation or unsafe condition or practice, unless the employee has first brought the alleged violation, condition or practice to the attention of a person having supervisory authority over the employee and has allowed the state employer a reasonable opportunity to correct that violation, condition or practice. Prior notice to a person having supervisory authority is not required if the employee reasonably believes that the report may not result in prompt correction of the violation, condition or practice. In such cases, the employee shall report the violation, condition or practice to the department or agency director of the state entity with which he is employed or to the office of the governor. In the event the alleged violation, condition or practice occurred within the office of the governor, the employee may report the violation, condition or practice to the office of the secretary of state.

Any employee who is discharged, disciplined or otherwise penalized by a state employer in violation of this section may after exhausting all available administrative remedies, bring a civil action within ninety (90) days after the date of the final administrative determination or within ninety (90) days after the violation, whichever is later, in the district court for the judicial district in which the violation is alleged to have occurred or where the state employer has its principal office. An employee’s recovery from any action under this section shall be limited to reinstatement of his previous job, payment of back wages and re-establishment of employee benefits to which he would have otherwise been entitled if the violation had not occurred. In addition, the court may allow the prevailing party his costs together with reasonable attorney’s fees to be taxed by the court. Any employee found to have knowingly made a false report shall be subject to disciplinary action by his employer up to and including dismissal.

A state employer shall ensure that its employees are aware of their rights under this chapter.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 123, § 1; 2013 ch. 16, § 1, effective February 12, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

deleted “held concerning an issue subject to reporting under this subsection” after “inquiry,” making a related change in (a)(iv); and in (b), added “or to the office of the governor” at the end of the third sentence and added the last sentence.

Laws 2013, ch. 16, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

§ 9-11-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 29, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1996, ch. 123, § 1, provided the sunset for §§

9-11-101

through

9-11-103

.